Arkansas, session 2025, SB619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 13, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 18 — Isolated School Districts

6-13-1801. Isolated school district — Formation.
(a)(1) An isolated school may detach from a resulting or receiving
district if the isolated school submits a petition to the resulting or
receiving school district board of directors that states the intent to
reestablish the original isolated school and that contains the signatures of:
(A) No less than three hundred fifty (350) registered
voters who reside within the boundaries of the isolated school; or
(B) No less than fifty-one percent (51%) of the registered
voters who reside within the boundaries of the isolated school.
(2)(A) The resulting or receiving school district board of
*TNL394*
04-14-2025 09:26:30 TNL394

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 H4/14/25 SB619
directors shall request the county clerk of the county in which the resulting
or receiving school district is located to verify the signatures submitted in
a petition under subdivision (a)(1) of this section within five (5) business
days of receipt of a petition under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(B) Upon request, a county clerk of the county in which
the resulting or receiving school district is located shall verify the
signatures within five (5) days of receipt of a request from the resulting or
receiving school district board of directors under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of
this section.
(3) The resulting or receiving school district board of
directors shall review a petition submitted under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section and call an election to be held for the voters who reside within the
school district boundaries of the isolated school before it consolidated with
the resulting or receiving district on the issue of an isolated school
detaching from a resulting or receiving district at the next annual school
election.
(b)(1) An isolated school district may be formed from an isolated
school within a resulting or receiving district that was annexed or
consolidated with another school district under the Public Education
Reorganization Act, § 6-13-1601 et seq., following the submission and
approval of a petition under subsection (a) of this section., following the
submission and approval of a petition under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) In order to qualify as an isolated school district, the
isolated school within a resulting or receiving district that was annexed or
consolidated with another school district under the Public Education
Reorganization Act, § 6-13-1601 et seq., shall have been in operation for
kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) within two (2) years of the date on
which the isolated school applies under this subchapter.
(b) The minimum school enrollment to establish a new public school
district shall not apply when forming an isolated school district under this
subchapter.

6-13-1802. Isolated school district board of directors.
(a) An isolated school district shall be governed by a board of
directors that consists of five (5) members who live within the boundaries of
the isolated school district.
04-14-2025 09:26:30 TNL394

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 H4/14/25 SB619
(b) The members of an isolated school district board of directors
shall be elected by eligible voters residing within the boundaries of the
isolated school district.
(c) Each member of an isolated school district board of directors
shall initially draw lots for two-year or four-year terms in isolated school
districts with four-year terms or two-year, four-year, or six-year terms in
isolated school districts with six-year terms so that, as nearly as possible,
an equal number of positions are filled in each subsequent election for an
isolated school board no longer than:
(1) Two (2) isolated school board elections for those with four-
year terms; or
(2) Three (3) isolated school board elections for those with
six-year terms.
6-13-1803. Funding.
(a) An election within the boundaries of an isolated school district
shall be held to establish the millage rate for the isolated school district
as required under § 26-80-111.
(b) For purposes of funding calculations that utilize prior-year
average daily membership, state funding aid for the first year of operation
of an isolated school district shall be based on the:
(1) Prior-year first three-quarters average daily membership of
the public school now proposed to operate as an isolated school district; or
(2) The average daily membership from two (2) years prior if the
public school proposed to operate as an isolated school district ceases
operations two (2) years before the isolated school district is formed.
(c) If an isolated school district begins operations at the beginning
of the following school year after detaching from a local public school
under which the proposed isolated school district currently operates, the
prior-year average daily membership of the isolated school shall be
subtracted from the prior-year average daily membership of the public school
district under which the isolated school previously operated.
(d) An isolated school district shall be eligible for funding awarded
under § 6-20-601 et seq. and any additional funds based on a school
district's isolated status.
(e) An isolated school district shall be eligible for any current
state funding available for public school districts and open-enrollment
04-14-2025 09:26:30 TNL394

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 H4/14/25 SB619
public charter schools.

6-13-1804. Facilities and property.
(a)(1) A local public school district under which a proposed isolated
school district currently operates shall agree to release ownership of the
isolated school's facilities and any accompanying debt on the facilities to
the isolated school district.
(2) The written release form required under subdivision (a)(1)
of this section shall be signed by the president of the school district board
of directors of the local public school district under which the proposed
isolated school district currently operates and shall be included in the
application submitted by the proposed isolated school district.
(b) Ownership of a school bus acquired with isolated school funds in
the previous two (2) school years shall be transferred to the resulting
isolated school district.
(c) Isolated school funds received by the local public school district
under which the proposed isolated school district currently operates within
four (4) months of the end of the public school district's fiscal year on
June 30 shall be transferred to the resulting isolated school district.
(d) Ownership of all furnishings, equipment, textbooks, computers,
technology, phone systems, audio-video systems, athletic equipment, and
machinery at an isolated school currently operating within a local school
district shall be transferred to the resulting isolated school district.

6-13-1805. Management.
An isolated school district shall be managed by:
(1) A director hired by the isolated school district;
(2) A director appointed by the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education to oversee operations of all isolated school districts in
the state; or
(3) Any other director or superintendent the division appoints
to the isolated school district.

/s/Irvin


04-14-2025 09:26:30 TNL394